dev/verbs/verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<v%> 

%<iv%>
%<tv%>

%<imp%>

%<p2%>

%<sg%>


LEXICON Root

Verbs ;



LEXICON CASES
!%<nom%>: CLITIC-COPULA ;
%<nom%>:  # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n # ;
%<acc%>:%>%{й}%{I%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{й}%{A%} # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{й}%{I%}%{A%} # ;


LEXICON SUBST 
CASES ;


LEXICON V-PERS-S1
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}m # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%n # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{k%} # ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%z # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{k%}l%{A%}r # ; 
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{й%}%{D%}%{I%} # ;
%<cond%>:%>%{й%}s%{A%} # ;

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-AOR
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}m # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}z # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I}z # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{й%}%{D%}%{I%} # ;
%<dob%>:%>%{й%}%m%{I%}ş # ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;



LEXICON POSSESSIVES
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASES  ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n CASES ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES  ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASES ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASES  ;
                         CASES ;


LEXICON V-IMPER
! The imperative, "çok yaşa!", "sigara içmeyin!"
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}n # ;
%<imp%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}n # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}n{I%}z #;



LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREG-NEG
%<neg%>%<gpr_aor%>:%>m%{A%}z # ;


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG
! All of the finite tenses that take negative in -mA-
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-PERS-S1 ;
%<cond%>:%>%{s%}%{A%} V-PERS-AOR ;



LEXICON GER-N-INFL-COMMON
CASES ;
POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST
GER-N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-GER
%<ger_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}k GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_abst%>:%>%{й%}{I%}ş GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_1%>:%>m%{A%}k GER-SUBST  ;
%<ger_1%>:%>m%{A%}%{A%} GER-SUBST  ;
%<ger_nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş GER-SUBST  ;

%<ger%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} GER-SUBST  ;


LEXICON V-GNA
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}r%{A%}k # ;
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna_when1%>:%>%{й}%{I%}nc%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<gna_aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-AOR ;
%<gna_ferq%>:%>%{A%} # ;
%<gna_time1%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}kç{A%} # ;
%<gna_time2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}kt{A%}n # ;
%<gna_when2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}yn%{A%}n # ;
%<gna_3%>:%>k%{A%}n%{A%} # ;
%<gna%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}d%{A%}%{A%}n # ;
%<gna_1%>:%>s%{A%} # ;
%<gna_2%>:%>%{A%}rs%{A%} # ;
!%<gna%>%<neg%>:%>m{A%} V-PERS-AOR ;


LEXICON V-GPR-SUBST
%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L}%{A%}r SUBST ;


LEXICON V-GPR
%<gpr%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}n V-GPR-SUBST ;
%<gpr_rsub%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}n # ;
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}c%{A%} POSSESSIVES ;
%<gpr_nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-GPR-SUBST ;
%<gpr_past1%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{I%}yn{A%}n # ;
%<gpr_past2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}k # ;
%<gpr_past2%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}%{D%}%{I%}k # ;
%<gpr_aor%>:%>{A%}r V-PERS-AOR  ;

!%<gpr%>%<neg%>:%>m{A%} POSSESSIVES ;





LEXICON V-NONFINITE
V-GNA  ;
V-GPR ;
V-GER ;


LEXICON V-COMMON 
V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
V-NONFINITE ;
V-FINITE-IRREG-NEG ;
%<aor%>:%>%{E%}r V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
%<aor%>:%>%{E%}r V-PERS-AOR ;
%<prog%>:%>%{A%}yor V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} V-NONFINITE ;
%<fut%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}c%{A%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}m%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
%<abil%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}bil V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;

V-IMPER ;

LEXICON V-DER
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ş V-COMMON ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} V-COMMON ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r V-COMMON ;

 V-COMMON ;


LEXICON V-TV 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-IV 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;


LEXICON Verbs 
yap:yap V-TV ; ! ""
çık:çık V-IV ; ! ""
